Washington statutes.
RCW 43.20.025

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Commissary" means an approved food establishment where food is stored, prepared, portioned, or packaged for service elsewhere.

(2) "Commissions" means the Washington state commission on African American affairs established in chapter 43.113 RCW, the Washington state commission on Asian Pacific American affairs established in chapter 43.117 RCW, the Washington state commission on Hispanic affairs established in chapter 43.115 RCW, and the governor's office of Indian affairs.

(3) "Consumer representative" means any person who is not an elected official, who has no fiduciary obligation to a health facility or other health agency, and who has no material financial interest in the rendering of health services.

(4) "Council" means the governor's interagency coordinating council on health disparities, convened according to this chapter.

(5) "Department" means the department of health.

(6) "Health disparities" means the difference in incidence, prevalence, mortality, or burden of disease and other adverse health conditions, including lack of access to proven health care services that exists between specific population groups in Washington state.

(7) "Health impact review" means a review of a legislative or budgetary proposal completed according to the terms of this chapter that determines the extent to which the proposal improves or exacerbates health disparities.

(8) "Local health board" means a health board created pursuant to chapter 70.05, 70.08, or 70.46 RCW.

(9) "Local health officer" means the legally qualified physician appointed as a health officer pursuant to chapter 70.05, 70.08, or 70.46 RCW.

(10) "Mobile food unit" means a readily movable food establishment.

(11) "Regulatory authority" means the local, state, or federal enforcement body or authorized representative having jurisdiction over the food establishment. The local board of health, acting through the local health officer, is the regulatory authority for the activity of a food establishment, except as otherwise provided by law.

(12) "Secretary" means the secretary of health, or the secretary's designee.

(13) "Servicing area" means an operating base location to which a mobile food unit or transportation vehicle returns regularly for such things as vehicle and equipment cleaning, discharging liquid or solid wastes, refilling water tanks and ice bins, and boarding food.

(14) "Social determinants of health" means those elements of social structure most closely shown to affect health and illness, including at a minimum, early learning, education, socioeconomic standing, safe housing, gender, incidence of violence, convenient and affordable access to safe opportunities for physical activity, healthy diet, and appropriate health care services.

(15) "State board" means the state board of health created under this chapter.

[ 2019 c 185 s 1; 2006 c 239 s 2; 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 208; 1984 c 243 s 1.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The definitions in this section have been alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k).

Effective date—Severability—1989 1st ex.s. c 9: See RCW 43.70.910 and 43.70.920.